Wyoming statutes. Title 35 Public Health and Safety
Article 6. Community Human Services

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Community residence for mentally disabled persons as violation of restrictive covenant, 41 ALR4th 1216.

Validity, construction and effect of statute requiring consultation with, or approval of, local governmental unit prior to locating group home, halfway house or similar community residence for the mentally ill, 51 ALR4th 1096.

Social worker malpractice, 58 ALR4th 977.

57 C.J.S. Insane Persons §§ 204 to 206.

§§ 35-1-601 through 35-1-610.
[Repealed.]

Repealed by Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 3.

Editor's notes. —

These sections, which derived from Laws 1961, ch. 144, §§ 2 to 11, related to community mental health services.

§ 35-1-611.
Short title.

This act shall be known as the “Community Human Services Act”.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-612.
Purpose. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The purpose and intent of this act is to establish, maintain and promote the development of a comprehensive range of services in communities of the state to provide prevention of, and treatment for individuals affected by, mental illness, substance abuse, or developmental disabilities, and to provide shelter and crisis services for victims of family violence and sexual assault.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, substituted "serve priority populations and other persons" for "provide prevention of, and treatment for individuals," "use disorders" for "abuse" and made a stylistic change.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in this section, see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-612.
Purpose. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The purpose and intent of this act is to establish, maintain and promote the development of a comprehensive range of services in communities of the state to serve priority populations and other persons affected by mental illness, substance use disorders, or developmental disabilities, and to provide shelter and crisis services for victims of family violence and sexual assault.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-613.
Definitions. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Community board” means a community mental health board, a substance abuse board, a developmental disabilities board, or a family violence and sexual assault board, or a board offering a combination of human services programs, created under this act. For the purposes of this act every community board is also a public agency;

“Developmental disabilities” means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism or any other neurological condition requiring services similar to those required by persons with intellectual disabilities, that has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely and constitutes a substantial impairment to the individual’s ability to function in society;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Human services program” means community facilities, services and programs which exclusively or in part, are used or operated to prevent or treat mental illness, substance abuse or developmental disabilities, to provide shelter and crisis services for victims of family violence or sexual assault or to provide other community based services which serve a public purpose;

“Mental illness” means a condition which is manifested by a disorder or disturbance in behavior, feeling, thinking or judgment to such an extent that care and treatment are required;

“Public agency” means an organization operated by a unit of local government or a combination of governments or agencies formed under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act [§§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

];

“Substance” means alcoholic beverages and other drugs;

“Substance abuse” means the use, without compelling medical reason, of any substance which results in psychological or physiological dependency as a function of continued use in such a manner as to induce mental, emotional or physical impairment or to cause socially dysfunctional behavior;

“Client” means any individual receiving services from a human service program authorized under this act;

“Crisis services for victims of family violence and sexual assault” means emergency intervention, information, referral services and medical, legal and social services advocacy;

“Sexual assault” means any act made criminal under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

and

6-4-402

;

“Family violence” means domestic abuse as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iii);

“Shelter” means a place of temporary refuge, offered on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7) day per week basis to victims of domestic violence and their children;

“This act” means W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-627

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2004 amendment,

in (a)(xi), substituted “6-2-304” for “6-2-305.”

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 4, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved March 19, 2004.

The 2008 amendment,

in (a)(ii), substituted “intellectual disability” for “mental retardation,” substituted “neurological condition” for “neurologically handicapping condition,” substituted “persons with intellectual disabilities” for “mentally retarded individuals,” substituted “impairment” for “handicap,” and deleted “normally” after “ability to function” near the end.

Laws 2008, ch. 70, § 3, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, of the Wyo. Const. Approved March 7, 2008.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, substituted “use disorder” for “abuse” following “substance” throughout (a); added “, but does not include addiction to drugs or alcohol, drug or alcohol intoxication or developmental disabilities” in (a)(v); added (a)(xiv) through (a)(xxiii); and redesignated former (a)(xiv) as (a)(xxiv).

The 2022 amendment,

effective July 1, 2024, in (a)(xvii)(C), added “by a youth crisis shelter, school, primary care provider, licensed therapist or law enforcement officer,” deleted “and the treatment is necessary to prevent child's involvement in the judicial system” at the end; substituted “two hundred percent (200%)” for “one hundred fifty percent (150%)” in (a)(xix); substituted “a” for “an intensive outpatient” in (a)(xxi)(B); and substituted “or who are awaiting admission to, evaluation from or have been evaluated by” for “, released or discharged from” in (a)(xxiii).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Conflicting legislation. —

Laws 2004, ch. 130, § 3, provides: “Any other act adopted by the Wyoming legislature during the same session in which this act is adopted shall be given precedence and shall prevail over the amendments in this act to the extent that such acts are in conflict with this act.”

§ 35-1-613.
Definitions. [Effective July 1, 2024]

As used in this act:

“Community board” means a community mental health board, a substance use disorder board, a developmental disabilities board, or a family violence and sexual assault board, or a board offering a combination of human services programs, created under this act. For the purposes of this act every community board is also a public agency;

“Developmental disabilities” means a disability attributable to intellectual disability, cerebral palsy, epilepsy, autism or any other neurological condition requiring services similar to those required by persons with intellectual disabilities, that has continued or can be expected to continue indefinitely and constitutes a substantial impairment to the individual’s ability to function in society;

“Department” means the department of health;

“Human services program” means community facilities, services and programs which exclusively or in part, are used or operated to prevent or treat mental illness, substance use disorders or developmental disabilities, to provide shelter and crisis services for victims of family violence or sexual assault or to provide other community based services which serve a public purpose;

“Mental illness” means a condition which is manifested by a disorder or disturbance in behavior, feeling, thinking or judgment to such an extent that care and treatment are required, but does not include addiction to drugs or alcohol, drug or alcohol intoxication or developmental disabilities;

“Public agency” means an organization operated by a unit of local government or a combination of governments or agencies formed under the Wyoming Joint Powers Act [§§

16-1-102

through

16-1-109

];

“Substance” means alcoholic beverages and other drugs;

“Substance use disorder” means the use, without compelling medical reason, of any substance which results in psychological or physiological dependency as a function of continued use in such a manner as to induce mental, emotional or physical impairment or to cause socially dysfunctional behavior;

“Client” means any individual receiving services from a human service program authorized under this act;

“Crisis services for victims of family violence and sexual assault” means emergency intervention, information, referral services and medical, legal and social services advocacy;

“Sexual assault” means any act made criminal under W.S.

6-2-302

through

6-2-304

and

6-4-402

;

“Family violence” means domestic abuse as defined by W.S. 35-21-102(a)(iii);

“Shelter” means a place of temporary refuge, offered on a twenty-four (24) hour, seven (7) day per week basis to victims of domestic violence and their children;

“Adults with acute mental illness” means persons who are subject to an emergency detention under W.S.

25-10-109

, an involuntary hospitalization order under W.S.

25-10-110

or a directed outpatient commitment order under W.S.

25-10-110

.1, or who were released from an emergency detention or were discharged from an involuntary hospitalization or directed outpatient commitment order within the last six (6) months;

“Adults with severe mental illness” means persons who, based on diagnosis and history, have a substantial probability of being unable to meet their needs for food, shelter and medical care if they do not receive regular mental health treatment or case management;

“Behavioral health center” means:

A nationally accredited organization that is licensed to conduct business in the state of Wyoming and provides a comprehensive range of services for the treatment and management of mental illness and substance use disorders for priority populations; or

For the purpose of federal reimbursement, a tribal federally qualified health center or a behavioral health service provider certified by the Indian health service of the United States department of health and human services.

“Families at high risk” means:

Children who have been discharged from an acute psychiatric facility or a psychiatric residential treatment facility within the previous six (6) months, and their immediate family members as defined by rule of the department of family services;

A child or the parent, legal guardian or other immediate family member of a child, as defined by rule of the department of family services, who has been referred to a behavioral health center by the department of family services for treatment for a mental illness or a substance use disorder and the treatment is necessary to prevent the removal of the child from the child’s home or to reunify the child with the child’s family;

A child who has been referred to a behavioral health center by a youth crisis shelter, school, primary care provider, licensed therapist or law enforcement officer for treatment for mental illness or a substance use disorder that impacts the child's life.

“General access clients” means persons who do not meet the definition of a priority population under paragraph (xxii) of this subsection;

“Indigent general access clients” means persons who do not have private or public health insurance that provides coverage for mental illness or substance use disorder treatment and whose total household income is not more than two hundred percent (200%) of the federal poverty level;

“Indigent clients with high needs” means persons who meet the definition of indigent general access clients under paragraph (xix) of this subsection and who have a mental illness or substance use disorder that substantially impairs their ability to function in society;

“Nonstate level justice involved” means:

Persons who within the previous six (6) months have been placed on probation and made subject to an intensive supervision program under W.S.

7-13-1102

that includes treatment for a mental illness or a substance use disorder;

Persons who within the previous six (6) months have been convicted of or pled nolo contendere to a criminal offense and ordered to enroll in a treatment program for a mental illness or substance use disorder as part of their sentence;

Persons on probation, parole or who have been conditionally released, who within the previous six (6) months have been sanctioned under W.S. 7-13-1802(b)(iv) through (vi) and ordered to receive treatment for a mental illness or a substance use disorder;

Qualified offenders under W.S.

7-13-1301

through

7-13-1304

who within the previous six (6) months have been ordered to receive treatment for a substance use disorder.

“Priority population” means any person, as determined by the department, who falls into any of the following categories:

State level justice involved;

Nonstate level justice involved;

Families at high risk;

Adults with acute mental illness;

Adults with severe mental illness;

Indigent clients with high needs;

Indigent general access clients.

“State level justice involved” means persons that within the previous six (6) months have been released or paroled from an institution as defined by W.S. 7-13-401(a)(vi) or who are awaiting admission to, evaluation from or have been evaluated by a facility as defined under W.S 7-11-301(a)(ii) and who require continuing treatment for a mental illness or substance use disorder;

“This act” means W.S.

35-1-611

through

35-1-627

.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 2004, ch. 130, § 1; 2008, ch. 70, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024; 2022 ch. 31, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-614.
Counties, school districts and cities may contract for human services programs; counties may establish community boards. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

A county may contract with private or public agencies to provide human services programs for the county. The county may appropriate funds for the programs.

A municipality may contract with private agencies or a community board to provide human services programs for the municipality. The municipality may appropriate funds for the programs.

A school district may contract with private or public agencies to provide human services programs for school age children.

A county may establish, or two (2) or more counties may agree to establish a community board, or community boards in accordance with this act. A community board shall provide human services to the entire county or counties in which it is established. A community board may offer one (1) or more services for the mentally ill, substance abuser, developmentally disabled or the victim of family violence or sexual assault.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, added "behavioral health centers or" preceding "private" in (a), (b) and (c); and substituted "persons affected by mental illness, substance use disorders, developmental disabilities or victims" for "the mentally ill, substance abuser, developmentally disabled or the victim" in (d).

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the first sentence in subsection (d), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-614.
Counties, school districts and cities may contract for human services programs; counties may establish community boards. [Effective July 1, 2024]

A county may contract with behavioral health centers or private or public agencies to provide human services programs for the county. The county may appropriate funds for the programs.

A municipality may contract with behavioral health centers or private agencies or a community board to provide human services programs for the municipality. The municipality may appropriate funds for the programs.

A school district may contract with behavioral health centers or private or public agencies to provide human services programs for school age children.

A county may establish, or two (2) or more counties may agree to establish a community board, or community boards in accordance with this act. A community board shall provide human services to the entire county or counties in which it is established. A community board may offer one (1) or more services for persons affected by mental illness, substance use disorders, developmental disabilities or victims of family violence or sexual assault.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-615.
Community board is agency of county; appropriations; joint community board agreements.

A community board is an agency of the county government.

A county which establishes or agrees to establish a community board, or community boards may appropriate funds for human services programs.

When two (2) or more counties have agreed to establish a community board, the funds appropriated by the counties shall be expended by the board in accordance with the agreement between the counties. The agreement shall require each county to bear a cost proportionate to the services provided in the county. The agreement may specify that, for particular purposes, officers and employees of a joint community board are considered employees of a participating county.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

§ 35-1-616.
Community boards; membership; appointment; terms of office; removal; vacancies; compensation.

A community or joint board shall consist of not more than nine (9) members, unless the board is comprised of members from two (2) or more counties in which event the board shall consist of not more than fifteen (15) members.

The members of a community board shall be appointed by the county commissioners. When two (2) or more counties have agreed to establish a community board, the county commissioners of each participating county shall appoint members as provided in the agreement of the counties. The members appointed by each county shall represent their county on the community board.

Members of community boards shall serve for rotating terms of four (4) years. Of the members first appointed, one-third (1/3) shall be appointed for two (2) years, one-third (1/3) for three (3) years and one-third (1/3) for four (4) years. No member shall serve more than two (2) consecutive terms.

A member of a community board may be removed by the appointing authority for neglect of duty, misconduct or malfeasance in office after receiving a written statement of charges and an opportunity to be heard.

Vacancies shall be filled for unexpired terms in the same manner as original appointments.

The members of a community board may receive per diem compensation and may be allowed necessary and actual expenses to be audited and paid in the same manner as other expenses of the county.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

§ 35-1-617.
Community boards; meetings; officers.

A majority of the board constitutes a quorum. All actions of the board shall be approved by a majority of those present at the meeting.

A community board shall elect from its members a chairman to preside at meetings, a secretary to maintain the records and a finance officer who shall file with the board a bond with an approved corporate surety in the penal sum designated by the board.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

§ 35-1-618.
Community boards; powers. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

For each human services program authorized by the county commissioners the community boards may contract with a local public or private nonprofit provider or:

Appoint a director whose qualifications meet the standards fixed by the division;

Prescribe the director’s duties and fix his compensation;

Make rules or regulations relating to the operation of services and facilities under the board’s supervision, including a reasonable schedule of fees not inconsistent with the division’s uniform fee schedule;

Contract for facilities or support services;

Accept donations of money or property; and

Expend funds for the purposes and programs of the community board, including necessary capital construction, as authorized by the county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, added "behavioral health center or a" in (a).

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 35-1-618.
Community boards; powers. [Effective July 1, 2024]

For each human services program authorized by the county commissioners the community boards may contract with a behavioral health center or a local public or private nonprofit provider or:

Appoint a director whose qualifications meet the standards fixed by the division;

Prescribe the director’s duties and fix his compensation;

Make rules or regulations relating to the operation of services and facilities under the board’s supervision, including a reasonable schedule of fees not inconsistent with the division’s uniform fee schedule;

Contract for facilities or support services;

Accept donations of money or property; and

Expend funds for the purposes and programs of the community board, including necessary capital construction, as authorized by the county commissioners.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-619.
Community boards; duties.

Subject to this act, a community board shall:

Review and evaluate human services programs operating within its jurisdiction;

Submit to the commissioners for the county of which it is an agency a comprehensive plan for the establishment, development and promotion of human services programs;

Insure that the human services programs which are authorized by the county commissioners and funded by the county or the division are executed and maintained; and

Insure that clients are charged fees for services promulgated by the division.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-620.
Powers and duties of department and its divisions. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The department through its divisions may:

Enter into cooperative contracts with private agencies, public agencies and community boards by negotiation without competitive bids or by competitive bidding. The department shall not contract with any entity which is not in substantial compliance with the standards and guidelines under subsection (b) of this section. The department shall not contract with any entity to purchase shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

Consult with and advise community boards, political subdivisions, nonprofit corporations, state agencies, health and medical groups within the state and the United States public health service about standards for the promotion of services to residents of Wyoming for the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of mental illness, substance abuse and developmental disabilities and for the provision of other community based services which serve a public purpose.

The department shall:

Prescribe professional standards for personnel providing services purchased in whole or in part by the state under this act. The standards do not replace the standards for licensing under any other Wyoming law;

Prescribe standards for the quality of human services programs which provide state purchased services under this act;

Establish a uniform schedule of fees which will act as a guideline for state purchased services provided to clients by human services programs under this act. The schedule shall accurately reflect a client’s ability to pay;

Review and comment on an application for funds submitted by any entity to the federal government for a human services program established or funded under this act other than programs providing shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

Review and evaluate all programs authorized or funded under this act other than programs providing shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

For state purchased services select the most appropriate service providers within each region in order to achieve the most effective and efficient human services system;

Prescribe procedures to ensure that programs providing state purchased services provide for the confidentiality of patient records; and

Prescribe conditions of eligibility for funding under this act so that no person shall be denied services on the basis of race, creed, color, national origin or inability to pay.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

Cross references. —

As to department of health's duty to create an substance abuse control plan, see §

9-2-122

.

The 2021 amendment

, by ch. 79, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2024, added "the" in the section heading; added "behavioral health centers," in the first sentence of (a)(i); substituted "use disorders" for "abuse" in (a)(ii); substituted "funded" for "purchased" in (b)(ii); rewrote (b)(iii), which read, "Establish a uniform schedule of fees which will act as a guideline for state purchased services provided to clients by human services programs under this act. The schedule shall accurately reflect a client’s ability to pay"; rewrote (b)(vi), which read, "For state purchased services select the most appropriate service providers within each region in order to achieve the most effective and efficient human services system"; added (b)(ix) through (b)(xi) and (c); repealed (b)(iv), which read, "Review and comment on an application for funds submitted by any entity to the federal government for a human services program established or funded under this act other than programs providing shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault"; repealed (b)(v), which read, "Review and evaluate all programs authorized or funded under this act other than programs providing shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault"; repealed (b)(vii), which read, "Prescribe procedures to ensure that programs providing state purchased services provide for the confidentiality of patient records; and"; and repealed (b)(viii), which read, "Prescribe conditions of eligibility for funding under this act so that no person shall be denied services on the basis of race, creed, color, national origin or inability to pay."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to throughout subsection (b), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-620.
Powers and duties of the department and its divisions. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The department through its divisions may:

Enter into cooperative contracts with behavioral health centers, private agencies, public agencies and community boards by negotiation without competitive bids or by competitive bidding. The department shall not contract with any entity which is not in substantial compliance with the standards and guidelines under subsection (b) of this section. The department shall not contract with any entity to purchase shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

Consult with and advise community boards, political subdivisions, nonprofit corporations, state agencies, health and medical groups within the state and the United States public health service about standards for the promotion of services to residents of Wyoming for the prevention, diagnosis and treatment of mental illness, substance use disorders and developmental disabilities and for the provision of other community based services which serve a public purpose.

The department shall:

Prescribe professional standards for personnel providing services purchased in whole or in part by the state under this act. The standards do not replace the standards for licensing under any other Wyoming law;

Prescribe standards for the quality of human services programs which provide state funded services under this act;

Establish payment policies for state funded services provided to priority populations that take into account a client’s ability to pay and utilize general funds authorized for expenditure as the payment of last resort;

and (v) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 79, § 2.

Prioritize behavioral health centers as the providers of state funded services. If a behavioral health center cannot provide sufficient services, the department shall select the most appropriate service provider in order to achieve an effective and efficient delivery of mental illness and substance use disorder services and human services programming;

and (viii) Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 79, § 2.

Prioritize the delivery of state funded services to priority populations and allocate those services between priority populations in the following order of priority, with tier 1 being the highest priority and tier 3 being the lowest priority among priority populations:

Tier 1: priority populations specified under W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xxii)(A) through (E);

Tier 2: priority populations specified under W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xxii)(F), who do not otherwise qualify under Tier 1;

Tier 3: priority populations specified under W.S. 35-1-613(a)(xxii)(G), who do not otherwise qualify under Tiers 1 or 2.

Subject to subsection (c) of this section, the priority populations tier requirements under paragraph (ix) of this subsection and in addition to other contractual payments to behavioral health centers and other service providers under this act, the department shall provide essential subsidy payments to eligible behavioral health centers, or to other eligible service providers under paragraph (vi) of this subsection, to help defer continuing operating costs needed to provide services to priority populations. A behavioral health center or other service provider under paragraph (vi) of this subsection shall be eligible to receive essential subsidy payments only upon demonstrating a need for operational cost assistance as determined by rule of the department. The amount of any essential subsidy payment shall be subject to available funding and based on the total population of the geographic area served by the behavioral health center or other provider and the number of other behavioral health care providers within a thirty-five (35) mile radius;

Prioritize behavioral health centers for the delivery of gatekeeping services as provided by W.S. 25-10-112(g) and only assume the expenses associated with a gatekeeper under W.S. 25-10-112(j) when the gatekeeper has been contracted through a behavioral health center.

Behavioral health centers may provide mental health or substance use disorder services to general access clients provided that the service is funded through any combination of sources other than state funding for priority populations under this section. Behavioral health centers may use the facilities, supplies and personnel funded under paragraph (x) of this subsection to provide services to general access clients provided services to priority populations are not materially diminished. When the means of the state allow, the department is authorized to seek funding through the budget process to deliver mental health or substance use disorder services to general access clients.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2021 ch. 79, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-621.
All state funds for human services contracted to department; federal and private funding not affected. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

A state agency which provides state or federal funds to a community based mental health, substance abuse, developmental disabilities or other human services program shall contract the funds to the department. The department shall expend the funds in accordance with W.S.

9-2-102

and this act. This section does not impair the ability of community based programs to apply for or receive funds directly from federal or private sources, subject to W.S. 35-1-620(b)(i).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, substituted "use disorder" for "abuse" following "substance" in the first sentence.

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence, see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-621.
All state funds for human services contracted to department; federal and private funding not affected. [Effective July 1, 2024]

A state agency which provides state or federal funds to a community based mental health, substance use disorder, developmental disabilities or other human services program shall contract the funds to the department. The department shall expend the funds in accordance with W.S.

9-2-102

and this act. This section does not impair the ability of community based programs to apply for or receive funds directly from federal or private sources, subject to W.S. 35-1-620(b)(i).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1984, ch. 31, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1993, ch. 150, § 1; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-622.
Department; budget requests; purchase of service contracts; local match. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

The department’s budget request shall recommend:

The types of services that the division shall purchase, which shall not include shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

The levels of services that the division shall purchase based on population, needs assessment, regional cost differences necessary to provide reasonably similar access to services and other criteria; and

The quality of services that the division shall purchase.

The department shall contract with community boards, public agencies and private agencies to purchase only those services funded by the legislature on a statewide basis. Funds contracted for under this act, other than funds for developmental preschool services, shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total nonfederal expenditures for human services programs by any community board or public agency. For developmental preschool services the local match requirement shall be three percent (3%).

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2007, ch. 125, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2007 amendment,

in (b) inserted “other than funds for developmental preschool services,” and added the last sentence.

Laws 2007, ch. 125, § 2, makes the act effective immediately upon completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law as provided by art. 4, § 8, Wyo. Const. Approved February 23, 2007.

The 2021 amendment,

by ch. 79, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2024, deleted "; local match" in the section heading; added "in accordance with the priority populations tier requirements provided by W.S. 35-1-620(b)(ix)," in (a)(i); and repealed (b), which read, "The department shall contract with community boards, public agencies and private agencies to purchase only those services funded by the legislature on a statewide basis. Funds contracted for under this act, other than funds for developmental preschool services, shall not exceed ninety percent (90%) of the total nonfederal expenditures for human services programs by any community board or public agency. For developmental preschool services the local match requirement shall be three percent (3%)."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the second sentence in subsection (b), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-622.
Department; budget requests; purchase of service contracts. [Effective July 1, 2024]

The department’s budget request shall recommend:

The types of services that the division shall purchase, in accordance with the priority populations tier requirements provided by W.S. 35-1-620(b)(ix), which shall not include shelter and crisis services for victims of domestic abuse or sexual assault;

The levels of services that the division shall purchase based on population, needs assessment, regional cost differences necessary to provide reasonably similar access to services and other criteria; and

The quality of services that the division shall purchase.

Repealed by Laws 2021, ch. 79, § 2.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 1998, ch. 81, § 2; 2007, ch. 125, § 1; 2021 ch. 79, §§ 1, 2, effective July 1, 2024.

§ 35-1-623.
Contracts; reports; regular payments; termination. [Effective until July 1, 2024]

Every contract awarded pursuant to this act shall require:

]he program provider to submit annual financial and expenditure reports to the department;

The division to make regular payments to the program provider based on the services provided;

Compliance with W.S. 18-3-516(e).

The division shall terminate a contract with a program provider made under this act when the division finds, after a hearing in accordance with W.S.

16-3-107

through

16-3-112

if requested by the provider, that the program provider is not using contract funds for contract purposes, or that a contract program is not being administered in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1986, ch. 44, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.

The 2021 amendment

, effective July 1, 2024, deleted "program" preceding "provider" in (a)(i) and (a)(ii); in (b), substituted "behavioral health center or other" for "program," deleted "program" preceding "provider is not" and "program" following "contract."

Meaning of “this act.” —

For the definition of “this act,” referred to in the introductory language of subsection (a) and twice in subsection (b), see § 35-1-613(a)(xiv).

§ 35-1-623.
Contracts; reports; regular payments; termination. [Effective July 1, 2024]

Every contract awarded pursuant to this act shall require:

The provider to submit annual financial and expenditure reports to the department;

The division to make regular payments to the provider based on the services provided;

Compliance with W.S. 18-3-516(e).

The division shall terminate a contract with a behavioral health center or other provider made under this act when the division finds, after a hearing in accordance with W.S.

16-3-107

through

16-3-112

if requested by the provider, that the provider is not using contract funds for contract purposes, or that a contract is not being administered in accordance with this act.

History.

Laws 1979, ch. 155, § 1; 1986, ch. 44, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2021 ch. 79, § 1, effective July 1, 2024.